District of Columbia statutes.
16-1103

Contents of complaint; adverse possession.

In his complaint in ejectment, the plaintiff shall:

(1)

describe the premises claimed with reasonable certainty; and

(2)

set forth distinctly the nature and quantity of the estate claimed by him in the premises.

It is sufficient for the plaintiff to state, in addition, that:

(1)

he was possessed of the premises, and while he was so possessed the defendant entered wrongfully into possession thereof, and withholds the possession of the premises from the plaintiff, or wrongfully detains possession; or

(2)

the defendant is wrongfully exercising acts of ownership over the premises.

However, except as provided by this chapter, acts of ownership do not amount to an adversary possession, so as to make it necessary for the plaintiff to sue in order to avoid the bar of the statute of limitations.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1103.
1973 Ed., § 16-1103.